Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.020

First members.

The first members of the Washington State Bar Association shall be all persons now [on June 7, 1933] entitled to practice law in this state.

[ 1933 c 94 s 3; RRS s 138-3. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1933 c 94 s 4; RRS s 138-4 now codified as RCW 2.48.021.]